Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1832.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Department of gaming; regulatory assessment; pari-mutuel pool Notwithstanding any other law, in fiscal year 2026-2027, the department of gaming shall establish and collect a regulatory assessment from each commercial racing permittee, payable from amounts deducted from pari-mutuel pools by the permittee, in addition to the amounts the permittee is authorized to deduct pursuant to section 5-111, subsection B, Arizona Revised Statutes, from amounts wagered on live and simulcast races from in-state and out-of-state wagering handled by the permittee, in the amount of 0.5 percent of the amounts wagered. Sec. 2. Department of gaming; horse racing; gate approval; timed workouts; delayed repeal A. Notwithstanding any other law, for race meetings in the years 2026 and 2027, the department of gaming may allow a first-time starter horse to race as long as the horse has gate approval and at least two timed workouts. One of the timed workouts shall be an out-of-the-gate workout that is conducted within sixty days of the race in which the horse is entered. B. This section is repealed from and after December 31, 2027.